Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2403.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Appropriation; Arizona health care cost containment system; provider increases The sum of $2,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the Arizona health care cost containment system for provider increases for home and community based services providers for the elderly and persons with physical disabilities.